Ohio, session 136, SB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4740.99 be amended and section 4740.18 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4740.18. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Residential-only certification" means a certification the Ohio construction industry licensing board issues under this section to a residential heating, ventilating, and air conditioning contractor, residential refrigeration contractor, residential electrical contractor, residential plumbing contractor, or residential hydronics contractor. (2) "Residential contractor" means an individual or residential contracting company that satisfies both of the following: (a) Has responsibility for the means, method, and manner of construction, improvement, renovation, repair, or maintenance on a residential construction project with respect to one or more trades and who offers, identifies, advertises, or otherwise holds out or represents that the individual or residential contracting company with which the individual is associated is permitted or qualified to perform or have responsibility for the means, method, and manner of construction, improvement, renovation, repair, or maintenance with respect to one or more trades on a residential construction project; (b) Does any of the following: (i) Performs construction, improvement, or renovation on a residential construction project with respect to the individual's or residential contracting company's trade; (ii) Employs tradespersons who perform construction, improvement, or renovation on a construction project with respect to the individual's or contracting company's trades; (iii) Uses direct labor subcontractors who perform construction, improvement, or renovation on a residential construction project with respect to the individual's or contracting company's trades. (3) "Residential contracting company" means a company in the construction industry that contracts with a person for a residential construction project involving heating, ventilating, and air conditioning, refrigeration, electrical, plumbing, or hydronics. (4) "Residential construction project" means a project involving a residential building subject to Chapter 3781. of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that chapter. (5) "Direct labor subcontractor" means an individual who engages in construction, improvement, renovation, repair, or maintenance of a residential construction project under terms specified in an agreement with a residential contractor and to whom both of the following apply: (a) The residential contractor has the right to control or direct only the result of the construction, improvement, renovation, repair, or maintenance performed by the individual; (b) The income the individual earns from the construction, improvement, renovation, repair, or maintenance is subject to the "Self-Employment Contributions Act of 1954," 26 U.S.C. 1401 et seq., and the regulations adopted under it. (6) "Residential building" and "industrialized unit" have the same meanings as in section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. (B) The administrative section of the Ohio construction industry licensing board shall issue a residential-only certificate to any individual who does all of the following: (1) Completes an application that includes an individual's name, the name of the residential contracting company associated with the individual, the amount of time the individual has engaged in the residential contracting business, and any other information that may be required by the appropriate specialty section of the board; (2) Maintains and provides proof of contractor's liability insurance in the name of the associated residential contracting company that includes complete operations coverage in an amount not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars; (3) Maintains and provides proof of contractor's liability insurance in the name of the associated residential contracting company that includes, in addition to the coverage required by division (B)(2) of this section, coverage for construction, improvements, renovations, repairs, or maintenance performed by the company's direct labor subcontractors in an amount not less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars; (4) Pays a certification fee of one hundred dollars, except if the certificate is to expire in less than five years, the certification fee shall be reduced proportionally based on the duration of the certification period. The certification fee shall not be less than twenty dollars. (C) Each certificate issued under this section shall include the the following: (1) The individual's name and certificate number; (2) The name of the residential contracting company associated with the individual; (3) The license number associated with any other licenses held by the individual under this chapter. (D) All residential-only certificates an individual holds under this section shall expire every fifth year on the same date, which shall be the expiration date of the original residential-only certificate the individual holds. An individual holding a valid, unexpired residential-only certificate may renew the certificate by submitting an application to the appropriate specialty section of the board not more than ninety days before the expiration of the certificate, along with a renewal fee of one hundred dollars. The application shall include proof of both of the following: (1) That the applicant continues to meet the certification requirements related to contractor's liability insurance under divisions (B)(2) and (3) of this section; (2) That the applicant has completed twenty hours of board-approved continuing education in the preceding certification period for each certification the individual holds. If the certification period is less than five years, the number of board-approved continuing education hours required shall instead be the product of four hours times the number of full years that elapsed since the certification was issued. In no case shall the number of board-approved continuing education hours required for renewal of a residential-only certification be less than four. (E) Upon application within one calendar year after a certification has expired, the appropriate specialty section may waive any of the requirements for renewal of a residential-only certification if the section finds that the applicant substantially meets the renewal requirements or that failure to timely apply for renewal is due to excusable neglect. A section that waives requirements for renewal of a certification may impose conditions upon the certificate holder and assess a late filing fee of not more than two hundred dollars. An applicant shall satisfy any condition the section imposes before a certification is reissued. (F) A continuing education course may be counted for the renewal of a residential-only certificate only if both of the following apply: (1) The course is offered by a training agency approved by the administrative section of the Ohio construction industry licensing board that pays to the board an annual fee of twenty-five dollars for the purposes of establishing and maintaining that approval. (2) The course of study or program of instruction comprising the continuing education course is approved by the appropriate specialty section of the Ohio construction industry licensing board following payment by the training agency of a one-time fee of ten dollars plus one dollar per credit hour. (G) In addition to the fees prescribed by division (F) of this section, an approved training agency shall remit, in the form and manner required by the administrative section of the Ohio construction industry licensing board, a fee of one dollar per credit hour of instruction for each person who attends the training agency's continuing education courses. (H) No person shall knowingly act as or claim to be a certified residential-only contractor unless that person holds or has been issued a residential-only certificate under this section. (I) Upon the request of the appropriate specialty section of the Ohio construction industry licensing board, the attorney general may bring a civil action for appropriate relief, including a temporary restraining order or permanent injunction in the court of common pleas of the county where the person alleged to have violated division (F) or (H) of this section resides or is acting or claiming to be a certified residential-only contractor or offering or purporting to offer continuing education courses, as applicable. (J) This section does not require a residential contractor or any other person to obtain a residential-only certification to work on residential construction projects in this state. (K) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require a direct labor subcontractor to be licensed or certified under this chapter. Sec. 4740.99. Whoever violates division (A) of section 4740.13 or division (H) of section 4740.18 of the Revised Code is guilty of a minor misdemeanor on the first violation and a misdemeanor of the fourth degree on subsequent violations. Section 2. That existing section 4740.99 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.